South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3330.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 17, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-17-180. A school district may not expend more than twelve and one half percent of the district's total budget on operational expenses, not including bonded indebtedness. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----